Illinois, session 104th, HB4693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.33a as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.33a)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.33a)7    Sec. 2.33a. Trapping. 8    (a) It is unlawful to fail to visit and remove all animals 9from traps staked out, set, used, tended, placed or maintained 10at least once each calendar day.11    (b) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use, or 12maintain a foothold leghold trap or one of similar 13construction on land, that has a jaw spread of larger than 6 141/2 inches (16.6 CM), or a body-gripping trap or one of similar 15construction having a jaw spread larger than 7 inches (17.8 16CM) on a side if square and 8 inches (20.4 CM) if round. The 17diameter of traps shall be measured from the inside edges of 18the outer most portion of the jaws of the trap. 19    (c) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use, or 20maintain a foothold leghold trap or one of similar 21construction in water, that has a jaw spread of larger than 7 221/2 inches (19.1 CM), or a body-gripping trap or one of similar 23construction having a jaw spread larger than 10 inches (25.4   HB4693- 2 -LRB104 18386 WRO 31828 b1CM) on a side if square and 12 inches (30.5 CM) if round. The 2diameter of traps shall be measured from the inside edges of 3the outer most portion of the jaws of the trap. 4    (d) It is unlawful to use any trap with saw-toothed, 5spiked, or toothed jaws.6    (e) It is unlawful to destroy, disturb or in any manner 7interfere with dams, lodges, burrows or feed beds of beaver 8while trapping for beaver or to set a trap inside a muskrat 9house or beaver lodge, except that this shall not apply to 10individuals who are acting pursuant to the provisions of 11Section 2.37 or as provided for by administrative rule.12    (f) It is unlawful to trap beaver or river otter with: (1) 13a foothold leghold trap or one of similar construction having 14an inside a jaw spread of less than 5 1/2 inches (13.9 CM) or 15more than 8 1/2 inches(21.59 CM) 7 1/2 inches (19.1 CM), or (2) 16a body-gripping trap or one of similar construction having a 17jaw spread of less than 7 inches (17.7 CM) or more than 10 18inches (25.4 CM) on a side if square and 12 inches (30.5 CM) if 19round, except that these restrictions shall not apply during 20the open season for trapping raccoons. The diameter of traps 21shall be measured from the inside edges of the outer most 22portion of the jaws of the trap. 23    (g) It is unlawful to set traps closer than 10 feet (3.05 24M) from any hole or den which may be occupied by a game mammal 25or fur-bearing mammal except that this restriction shall not 26apply to water sets.  HB4693- 3 -LRB104 18386 WRO 31828 b1    (h) It is unlawful to trap or attempt to trap any 2fur-bearing mammal with any colony, cage, box, or stove-pipe 3trap designed to take more than one mammal at a single setting.4    (i) It is unlawful for any person to set or place any trap 5designed to take any fur-bearing mammal protected by this Act 6during the closed trapping season. Proof that any trap was 7placed during the closed trapping season shall be deemed prima 8facie evidence of a violation of this provision.9    (j) It is unlawful to place, set, or maintain any foothold 10leghold trap or one of similar construction within thirty (30) 11feet (9.14 m) of bait placed in such a manner or position that 12it is not completely covered and concealed from sight, except 13that this shall not apply to underwater sets. Bait shall mean 14and include any bait composed of mammal, bird, or fish flesh, 15fur, hide, entrails or feathers.16    (k) (Blank).17    (l) It is unlawful for any person to place, set, use or 18maintain a snare trap or one of similar construction in water, 19that has a loop diameter exceeding 15 inches (38.1 CM) or a 20cable or wire diameter of more than 1/8 inch (3.2 MM) or less 21than 5/64 inch (2.0 MM), that is constructed of stainless 22steel metal cable or wire, and that does not have a mechanical 23lock, anchor swivel and stop device to prevent the mechanical 24lock from closing the noose loop to a diameter of less than 2 251/2 inches (6.4 CM).26    (m) It is unlawful to trap muskrat or mink with (1) a   HB4693- 4 -LRB104 18386 WRO 31828 b1foothold leghold trap or one of similar construction or (2) a 2body-gripping trap or one of similar construction unless the 3body-gripping trap or similar trap is completely submerged 4underwater when set. These restrictions shall not apply during 5the open season for trapping raccoons. 6(Source: P.A. 103-37, eff. 6-9-23.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.